Massachusetts, session 194th, S2264.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of Chapter 25A of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting after the words “alternative portfolio standard;” the following:- “ensure there are
adequate consumer protections in place for residential customers purchasing solar energy
products,”
SECTION 2. Section 6 of Chapter 25A of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting at the end of the section the following:
(16) regulate the sale of solar energy products to residential customers.
SECTION 3. Section 7 of Chapter 25A of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “electricity,” in the first paragraph add, the following:- solar energy
products when sold to residential customers,
of 3

SECTION 4. Section 7 of Chapter 25A of the General Laws is hereby amended further
amended by inserting after the word “electricity,” in the last paragraph, the following:- solar
energy products when sold to residential customers,
SECTION 5. Chapter 25A of the General Laws, as so is hereby amended by inserting:
Section 22: Residential Solar Consumer Protection
As used in this section, the following words shall have the following meanings unless the
context clearly requires otherwise:
“Solar energy product” an agreement involving the sale of equipment or power to an end
use customer that directly involves the installation of photovoltaic equipment or the purchase of
power from a photovoltaic system. This is inclusive of, but not limited to, lease agreements on
photovoltaic equipment, power purchase agreements involving the installation of photovoltaic
equipment, agreements and the direct purchase of photovoltaic equipment. This definition is not
inclusive of products or services which provide bill credits as part of a subscription, provided
those products or services are part of or participating in a solar energy incentive program
managed by the department.
The department shall regulate the sale of solar energy products to residential customers in
the Commonwealth with the aims of: (i) promoting the deployment and adoption of residential
solar energy products (ii) protecting residential customers from exploitative or unreasonable
contracts for solar energy products.
To further these aims the department shall: (i) create standard disclosure requirements,
and any related materials, necessary to assist consumers in understanding solar energy products,
of 3

(ii) require all residential contracts for solar energy products to be signed on paper, with the
customer receiving a paper copy immediately upon signing the contract at the latest; (iii) collect
that information which is necessary to reasonably ensure that companies selling solar energy
products to residential customers are doing so in a way that is in compliance with state and local
laws, including, but not limited to, local permitting requirements and the use of licensed workers
in those roles with licensure requirements, and (vi) create a licensing requirement and system for
all companies involved in the sale or installation of solar energy products.
The department may: (i) level fines against companies marketing or selling solar energy
products which fail to comply with the regulations put out by the department, (ii) directly, or
through a community organization, provide resources or support for residential customers who
have signed a contract for solar energy products which has caused them financial hardship, (iii)
regulate aspects of the relationship between third party salespeople marketing solar energy
products to residential customers and the companies which higher them to market solar energy
products, (iv) set a maximum per kWh price and escalation rate for power purchase agreements
for residential customers, (v) ensure that power purchase agreement contracts with residential
customers do not supply more power or credits than the residential customer needs, and (vi)
undertake other similar actions which are necessary to meet the goals outlined in the first
paragraph of this section.
Nothing in this section shall be read as interfering with the ability of the Office of the
Attorney General to exercise the power granted to it under Chapter 93A.
of 3